Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5
COUNTY PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ACT

Law reviews:

For article, "Improvement Districts for

C

olorado

C

ounties, Cities, and Towns", see 30 Colo. Law. 53 (Jan. 2001).

30-20-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "County Public Improvement District Act of 1968".

Source:

L. 68:

p. 162, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-2.

30-20-502. Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared that the organization of public improvement districts, having the purposes and powers provided in this part 5, shall serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants of said districts.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 162, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-1.

30-20-503. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

An "elector" of a district is a person who, at the designated time or event, is registered to vote in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.; and

Who is a resident of the district or the area to be included in the district; or

Who or whose spouse or civil union partner owns taxable real or personal property within the district or the area to be included in the district whether or not said person resides within the district.

A "taxpaying elector" of a district is an elector of a district who or whose spouse or civil union partner owns taxable real or personal property within the district or the area to be included within the district, whether or not said person resides within the district. Where the owner of taxable real or personal property specified in this paragraph (b) is not a natural person, a "taxpaying elector" of the district shall include a natural person designated by such owner to vote for such person. Such designation shall be in writing and filed with the county clerk and recorder. Only one person may be designated by an owner.

A person who is obligated to pay general taxes under a contract to purchase real property within the district shall be considered an owner within the meaning of this subsection (1). The ownership of property on which a specific ownership tax is paid pursuant to law shall not qualify a person as an elector nor as a taxpaying elector. Taxable property means real or personal property subject to general ad valorem taxes.

Registration pursuant to the general election laws or any other laws shall not be required.

"Governing body" means a board of county commissioners in a county.

"Improvement district", referred to in this part 5 as a "district", means a taxing unit that may be created by any county in this state for the purpose of constructing, installing, acquiring, operating, or maintaining any public improvement or for the purpose of providing any service so long as the county that forms the district is authorized to perform such service or provide such improvement under the county's home rule charter, if any, or the laws of this state, and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (3). "Public improvement" or "service" shall not include any facility identified in section 30-20-101 (8) or (9), nor shall the terms include services identified in section 30-15-401 (4) to (7.7) unless the district provides such services consistent with part 4 of article 15 of this title. No such district shall provide the same improvement or service as an existing special district within the territory of such existing special district unless the existing special district consents. A district may consist of noncontiguous tracts or parcels and may be organized wholly or partially within an existing special district if it is not providing the same service as the special district. For purposes of this part 5, a district may be created by or within a county for the purpose of constructing, installing, acquiring, operating, maintaining or providing fire protection regardless of whether or not the county is authorized to provide fire protection improvements or services. For purposes of this subsection (3), "fire protection" shall have the same meaning as "firehouses, equipment, and firefighters" as described in section 30-35-201 (22).

"Publication", if no manner of publication is specified, means publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. It shall not be necessary that publication be made on the same day of the week in each of the three consecutive weeks, but not less than fourteen days, excluding the day of first publication, shall intervene between the day of the first publication and the day of the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the day of the last publication.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 162, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-3.

L. 69:

p. 234, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 141, § 10.

L. 71:

p. 336, § 2.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1454, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 85:

(5) amended, p. 1069, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 1458, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 96:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1767, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 506, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 267, §§ 1, 2, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 265, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(I) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 57, § 8, effective February 18.

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this part 5, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

30-20-504. Authority of governing body.

Within the unincorporated territory of any county, the governing body of such county is hereby vested with jurisdiction, power, and authority to establish districts for the acquisition, construction, installation, operation, or maintenance of improvements or the provision of services authorized by this part 5. The governing body of a county may establish a district wholly or partially within the boundaries of any municipality or partially within the unincorporated territory of another county if such municipality or county consents by resolution to the establishment of such district.

If a municipality annexes or incorporates any territory within an established district, such territory shall remain in the district unless the municipality notifies the district's board of the municipality's intent to exclude the territory annexed or incorporated from the district. If the municipality notifies the board of its intent to exclude such territory, such exclusion shall take effect January 1 of the year following such notice. Any property excluded from the district under this subsection (2) shall remain subject to payment of its share of any indebtedness or bonds that are outstanding on the date of such exclusion.

At such time as all of the territory included within an existing district that has no outstanding indebtedness or bonds is annexed or incorporated into a municipality, the governing body of the municipality shall exercise all duties of the governing body of the district but continue to act under this section as if it were the board of county commissioners. The presiding officer of the governing body of the municipality shall be ex officio the presiding officer of the board, the clerk of the municipality shall be ex officio the secretary of the board, and the treasurer of the municipality shall be ex officio the treasurer of the board and district.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 163, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-4.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 507, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(3) added, p. 268, § 3, effective August 7.

30-20-505. Organization petition - contents.

The organization of a district shall be initiated by a petition filed in the office of the clerk of the board of county commissioners of the county creating the district. The petition shall be signed by not less than thirty percent or two hundred of the electors of the proposed district, whichever is less. After the filing of a petition, no signer shall be permitted to withdraw his or her name therefrom.

The petition shall set forth:

The name of the proposed district, which shall include the name of the county creating the district, a descriptive name or number, and the words "public improvement district";

A general description of the improvements to be constructed, installed, acquired, operated, or maintained or the services to be provided by the district;

The estimated cost of the proposed improvements or the estimated annual cost of providing the proposed services;

A general description of the boundaries of the district or the territory to be included therein, with such certainty as to enable a property owner to determine whether or not his or her property is within the district;

The names of three persons who shall represent the petitioners and who have the power to enter into agreements relating to the organization of the district, which agreements shall be binding on the district, if created;

A prayer for the organization of the district; and

A statement that either:

The boundaries of the proposed district include at least one hundred eligible electors;

The boundaries of the proposed district include at least one eligible elector for each five acres of land included within the proposed district; or

The petition is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of taxable real property to be included in the proposed district.

No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared void on account of alleged defects. The governing body, at any time, may permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory, or in any other particular. Similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition for the organization of the same district may be filed and together shall be regarded as one petition. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition filed shall be considered by the governing body the same as though filed with the first petition.

If the petition is signed by one hundred percent of the owners of the taxable real property to be included in the district and the petition contains a waiver request, the board of county commissioners may, at its discretion, waive all or any of the requirements for notice, publication, and a hearing set forth in sections 30-20-507 and 30-20-508.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 163, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-5.

L. 69:

p. 234, § 2.

L. 70:

p. 141, § 11.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1458, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 1069, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, p. 507, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(2)(e) amended, p. 268, § 4, effective August 7.

30-20-506. Bond of petitioners.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time prior to the time of hearing on said petition a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the governing body, or cash deposit made sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district is not effected. If at any time during the organization proceedings the governing body is satisfied that the bond first executed or the amount of cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days distant, and upon failure of the petitioners to file or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 164, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-6.

30-20-507. Notice of hearing.

As soon as possible after the filing of such petition, the governing body shall fix, by order, a place and time, not less than twenty days nor more than forty days after the petition is filed, for a hearing thereon. Thereupon the clerk of the governing body shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition, of the purposes and boundaries of the proposed district, and of the time and place of hearing thereon. The clerk shall also forthwith cause a copy of said notice to be mailed to each elector of the district at the elector's last-known address, as disclosed by the tax records of the counties and the last official voter registration lists. The clerk shall also cause a copy of said notice to be mailed to each municipality located within three miles of the boundaries of the proposed district at the same time notice is mailed to the electors of the district.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 164, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-7.

L. 70:

p. 142, § 12.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 509, § 4, effective April 30.

30-20-508. Hearing - dismissal - findings - declaration - when action barred.

On the day fixed for such hearing or at any adjournment thereof or, if the hearing is waived under section 30-20-505 (4), at any meeting at which a resolution creating a district is considered, the governing body shall ascertain from the tax rolls of the counties in which the district is located, from the last official registration list, and from such other evidence which may be adduced, the total number of electors of the district.

If it appears that said petition is not signed by at least the number of electors required under section 30-20-505 (1) or if it is shown that the proposed improvement or service will not confer a general benefit on the district or that the cost of the improvement or service would be excessive as compared with the value of the property in the district, the governing body shall thereupon dismiss the petition and adjudge the cost against those executing the bond filed to pay such costs. No appeal or other remedy shall lie from an order dismissing said proceeding. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the filing of subsequent petitions for similar improvements or services or for a similar district. The right so to renew such proceeding is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

The finding of the governing body upon the question of the genuineness of the signatures and all matters of fact incident to such determination shall be final and conclusive on all parties in interest, whether appearing or not.

Upon the hearing, if required, or without a hearing pursuant to section 30-20-505 (4), if it appears that a petition for the organization of a district has been duly signed and presented in conformity with this part 5 and that the allegations of the petition are true, the governing body, by resolution duly adopted and made effective, shall adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction and may order that the question of the organization of the district and such other matters as the governing body deems appropriate including, but not limited to, the issuance of bonds or other matters for which voter approval is required under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, be submitted to the electors at an election to be held for that purpose in accordance with the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. Unless provided otherwise in section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, such election may be held either at a special election within not less than sixty days but not more than one hundred eighty days after the date the governing body adopted the resolution or in conjunction with a general election, ballot issue election, or ballot question election.

At an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the electors of the district shall vote for or against the organization of the district and such other matters as the governing body deems appropriate, including, but not limited to, the issuance of bonds or matters for which voter approval is required under section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution. If a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the organization, the governing body shall adopt a resolution declaring the district organized.

If a petition filed with the governing body complies with section 30-20-505 (4), the governing body may adopt a resolution declaring the district organized without any notice, hearing, election, or the filing of a bond.

If the governing body adopts a resolution in accordance with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (4), the governing body shall give the district the corporate name specified in the petition by which, in all proceedings, it shall thereafter be known. Thereupon the district shall be a public or quasi-municipal subdivision of the state of Colorado and a body corporate with the limited proprietary powers set forth in this part 5.

Nothing in this subsection (4) authorizes a governing body to waive an election otherwise required under section 20 of article X and section 6 of article XI of the Colorado constitution or to hold an election inconsistent with the election requirements in said section 20.

If a resolution is adopted establishing the district, such resolution shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons, unless an action attacking the validity of the organization is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the adoption of such resolution.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 164, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-8.

L. 70:

p. 142, § 13.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1458, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 509, § 5, effective April 30.

30-20-508.1. Exclusion proviso. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1459, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 526, § 28, effective April 30.

30-20-509. Recording of resolution.

Within thirty days after a district is organized, the clerk of the governing body shall transmit for recording a copy of the resolution establishing the district to the county clerk and recorder of each of the counties in which the district or a part thereof is located.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 165, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-9.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1227, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 510, § 6, effective April 30.

30-20-510. Governing body constitutes board - duties.

The governing body of the county in which the district is located shall constitute ex officio the board of directors of the district. The presiding officer of the governing body shall be ex officio the presiding officer of the board, the clerk of the governing body shall be ex officio the secretary of the board, and the treasurer of the county shall be ex officio the treasurer of the board and district. Such board shall adopt a seal. The secretary shall keep in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically a record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, and all corporate acts, which shall be open to inspection by the owners of property in the district, as well as by all other interested parties. The treasurer shall keep permanent records containing accurate accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 165, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-10.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 561, § 6, effective August 5.

30-20-511. Meetings.

The board shall hold meetings, which shall be open to the public, in a place to be designated by the board as often as the needs of the district require, on notice to each member of the board. A quorum of the governing body shall constitute a quorum at any meeting. Notice of time and place of all regular and special meetings shall be posted in three public places within the limits of the district and in the county courthouse at least three days previous to such meetings.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 165, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-11.

Cross references:

For quorum of the governing body of a county, see § 1-4-205.

30-20-512. General powers of district.

The district has the following limited powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

Except as otherwise provided in this part 5, to enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with the United States and any of its agencies or instrumentalities. A notice shall be published for bids on all construction contracts for work or material, or both, involving an expense of one thousand dollars or more. The district may reject any and all bids, and if it appears that the district can perform the work or secure material for less than the lowest bid, it may proceed so to do.

To borrow money and incur general obligation indebtedness and evidence the same by bonds, certificates, warrants, notes, and debentures in accordance with the provisions of this part 5 and to issue revenue bonds or special assessment bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 5;

To acquire, construct, install, operate, and maintain the improvements or provide the services contemplated by this part 5, including improvements located outside the boundaries of the district, and all property, rights, or interest incidental or appurtenant thereto, and to dispose of real and personal property and any interest therein, including leases and easements in connection therewith; but any improvement or service, other than described in the organization petition, shall be first approved by either a petition signed by not less than fifty percent of the taxpaying electors in the district or by election;

To refund any general obligation indebtedness, revenue bonds, or special assessment bonds of the district without an election; otherwise, the terms and conditions of refunding bonds shall be substantially the same as those of an original issue of bonds of the district;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district and of the acquisition, construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of district improvements or the provision of services;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the same manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use, to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers granted in this part 5;

To construct and install improvements across or along any public street, alley, or highway, and to construct works across any stream of water or watercourses. However, the district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as completely or unnecessarily to impair the usefulness thereof. The use and occupation of streets, alleys, and highways, and the construction or installation of improvements by any district, shall be in accordance with the provisions of all applicable county resolutions and with such reasonable rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the governing body of the county.

To fix, and from time to time to increase or decrease, rates, tolls, or charges for any revenue-producing services or facilities furnished by the district, and to pledge such revenue for the payment of any indebtedness of the district. Until paid, all rates, tolls, or charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the property served, and any such lien may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided by the laws of the state of Colorado for the foreclosure of mechanics' liens. With respect to revenue-producing services or facilities, the board shall shut off or discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, tolls, or charges, or for delinquencies in the payment of taxes levied pursuant to this part 5, and shall prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for connecting with and disconnecting from such services and facilities.

To adopt and amend bylaws, not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state or with the resolution of the county affected, for carrying on the business, objects, and affairs of the board and of the district;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 5. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 5.

In a district providing fire protection services:

To create and maintain a firefighters' pension fund, under the provisions of parts 2 and 4 of article 30.5 of title 31, C.R.S., subject to the provisions of article 31 of said title, and a volunteer firefighter pension fund under part 11 of article 30 of title 31, C.R.S.; and

To adopt and enforce fire codes, as the board deems necessary, but no such code shall apply within any municipality or the unincorporated portion of any county unless the governing body of the municipality or county, as the case may be, adopts a resolution stating that the code or specific portions thereof shall be applicable within the portion of the municipality or the county that is within the district's boundaries; except that nothing in this subsection (1)(n) shall be construed to affect any existing fire codes that have been adopted by the governing body of a municipality or county. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no district providing fire protection service shall prohibit the sale of permissible fireworks, as defined in section 24-33.5-2001 (11), within its jurisdiction.

To conduct an election in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., for any purpose the board deems necessary or required.

A district has the power to construct, maintain, and operate safety measures that are necessary to allow the county to restrict the sounding of locomotive horns at highway-rail grade crossings in compliance with 49 U.S.C. sec. 20153, as amended, and the applicable rules of the federal railroad administration. The district shall construct, maintain, and operate the safety measures in accordance with the provisions of section 40-4-106, C.R.S., and the standards of safety prescribed by the public utilities commission pursuant to section 40-29-110, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 165, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-12.

L. 81:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1459, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(n) added, p. 1459, § 2, effective March 22.

L. 95:

(1)(n)(I) amended, p. 1380, § 4, effective June 30.

L. 96:

(1)(n)(II) amended, p. 283, § 2, effective April 11; (1)(n)(I) amended, p. 941, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 99:

(1)(e), (1)(f), (1)(g), and (1)(h) amended and (1)(o) added, p. 510, § 7, effective April 30.

L. 2006:

(2) added, p. 347, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(1)(n)(II) amended, (SB 17-222), ch. 245, p. 1028, § 6, effective August 9.

Cross references:

(1) For the power of eminent domain, see article 1 of title 38; for foreclosure of mechanics' liens, see article 22 of title 38.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 254, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

30-20-512.5. Local improvement districts - authority to establish.

In order to defray all or any portion of the costs of the improvements or services provided by the district, the board may establish local improvement districts within the boundaries of the district. Such local improvement districts may be established whenever the board determines that property in the district will be especially benefitted by such improvements or services. The method of creating local improvement districts, making the improvements or providing the services, and assessing the costs thereof shall be as provided in part 6 of this article. However, the electors eligible to vote on any question under this section shall either be electors of the district or electors within the proposed local improvement district, as determined by the board. In addition, the board shall perform the duties of the governing body as set forth in part 6 of this article, and the secretary of the district shall perform the duties of the county clerk and recorder as set forth in part 6 of this article. The improvements that the local improvement district may construct and the services that the local improvement district may provide shall be the improvements and the services that the district may provide under this part 5.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 513, § 10, effective April 30.

30-20-513. Determination of special benefits - factors considered.

The term "benefit", for the purposes of assessing a particular property within a public improvement district, particularly with respect to storm sewer drainage and to drainage improvements to carry off surface waters, includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Any increase in the market value of the property;

The provision for accepting the burden from specific dominant property for discharging surface water onto servient property in a manner or quantity greater than would naturally flow because the dominant owner made some of his property impermeable;

Any adaptability of property to a superior or more profitable use;

Any alleviation of health and sanitation hazards accruing to particular property or accruing to public property in the improvement district if the provision of health and sanitation is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any reduction in the maintenance costs of particular property or accruing to public property in the improvement district if the maintenance of the public property is paid for wholly or partially out of funds derived from taxation of property owners of the improvement district;

Any increase in convenience or reduction in inconvenience accruing to particular property owners, including the facilitation of access to and travel over streets, roads, and highways;

Recreational improvements accruing to particular property owners as a direct result of drainage improvement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 996, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-512.5 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-514. Power to levy taxes.

In addition to the other means of providing revenue for such districts, the board has the power to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable property within the district. Such power shall not prevent the issuance of obligations payable solely from the income of revenue-producing facilities.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 167, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-13.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-513 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-515. Determining and fixing rate of levy.

The board shall determine annually the amount of money necessary to be raised by a levy on the taxable property in the district, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district, together with other revenues, shall raise the amount required by the district during the ensuing fiscal year for paying expenses of organization and the costs of acquiring, constructing, installing, operating, and maintaining the improvements or works of the district or providing the services of the district and promptly to pay in full when due all interest on and principal of general obligation bonds or indebtedness and other obligations of the district. In the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, additional levies may be made as provided in section 30-20-516. At the time of certifying other tax levies, the board shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the district or a portion thereof lies the rate of levy so determined with directions that, at the time and in the manner required by law for levying of taxes for county purposes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district at the rate so fixed and determined, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 167, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-14.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 511, § 8, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-514 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-516. Levies to cover deficiencies.

The board, in fixing and determining the rate of levy, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the current and ensuing year on the contracts, bonds, interest on bonds, deficiencies, and defaults of prior years of the district, and shall make provision for the payment thereof. In case the money produced from such levy, together with other revenues of the district, is not sufficient to punctually meet the payments on the contracts, bonds, and interest on bonds of the district, and to pay defaults and deficiencies of the district, then the board, from year to year, shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for meeting such payments, and notwithstanding any limitations, such levies shall be made and continued until the indebtedness of the district is fully paid.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 167, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-15.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-515 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-517. County officers to levy and collect taxes - liens.

It is the duty of the governing body to levy the taxes certified to it, as provided in this part 5. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect and enforce such taxes at the time, in the form and manner, and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and, when collected, to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. All taxes levied under this part 5, together with the penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting same, shall constitute a lien, until paid, on and against the property taxed, as in the case of other general taxes.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 167, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-16.

30-20-518. Property sold for taxes.

The taxes provided for in this part 5 shall be a part of the general taxes and shall be paid accordingly. Sales of properties for delinquencies shall be in the same manner as is provided in the statutes of the state of Colorado for the sale of property for nonpayment of taxes.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 167, § 17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-17.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-517 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For procedures on sale of property for nonpayment of taxes, see part 11 of article 25 of title 31 and article 11 of title 39.

30-20-519. Reserve fund.

Whenever any indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it is lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet the obligations of the district, for operating charges and depreciation, and to provide extensions and betterments of the authorized improvements of the district.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 168, § 18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-18.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-518 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-520. Inclusion or exclusion - petition - notice - hearing - order.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this part 5 may be changed in the manner prescribed in this section, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; nor shall it affect, impair, or discharge any contract, obligation, lien, or charge for or upon which it might be liable or chargeable had any such change of boundaries not been made. The owners of property proposed to be included or excluded may file with the board a petition, in writing, praying that such property be included in or excluded from the district. The petition shall describe the property owned by the petitioners and shall be verified. The petition shall be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the inclusion or exclusion proceedings. The secretary of the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, and descriptions of property sought to be included or excluded, and the prayer of said petitioners.

Such notice shall state that all persons having objections to the petition may appear in the office of the board at the time set in said notice, and show cause why the petition should not be granted. The board, at the time and place set in the notice, or at such times to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto. The failure of any person interested to show cause shall be deemed an assent on his part to the inclusion or exclusion of such property as prayed for in the petition. If the petition is granted, the board shall adopt a resolution to that effect and file a certified copy of same with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located. Thereupon said property shall be included or excluded from the district.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 168, § 19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-19.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-519 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-521. Liability of property.

All property included within or excluded from a district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 168, § 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-25-20.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-520 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.